Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1535
Unauthorized removal of ballots; penalty.

Any person who removes any ballot from the polling room before the closing of the polls except as otherwise authorized under the Election Act shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 434.